apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
! oddsyll, cg, C-final, no 2ndsyll vowchange
LEXICON GÁMAS ! Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG but no VChange
 +N:%>Q1 NE-ODDCASE ;
 +N:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N:»X5 DenominalNounsODD ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsC ;
 +N:%>X5 ODDCmp ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>Q1 R ;


! oddsyll, cg, C-final, 2ndsyll vowchange, only long essive
LEXICON SÅHKÅR
 +N:%>Q1 N-ODDCASE ; ! To Nom only, since SÅHKÅR has no short essive.
 +N:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N:»X5 DenominalNounsODD ;
 +N:»X5 DenominalAdjsC ;
 +N:%>X5 ODDCmp ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>Q1 R ;


! oddsyll, no cg, no vowchange
LEXICON GAHPER
 +N:%> N-ODDCASE ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as gahper has no short Ess
 +N:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N:» DenominalNounsODD ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsC ;
 +N:%> ODDCmp ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;


! oddsyll, cg, vowchange, V-final nominative
LEXICON BENA
 +N:%>X3 BENA-NE ;
 +N:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N:»X5 DenominalNounsODD ;
 +N:»X5 DenominalAdjsC ;
 +N:%>X5 ODDCmp ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X3 R ;
 ! X5 for vow change

LEXICON DÁRBBAGA !like BENA BUT ONLY PLURAL
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X3 R ;
 +N+Ess:%>X3n K ;
 +N+Ess:%>X5in K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X5a K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5ij K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>X5ij#dagi K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>X5ij#dagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>X5ij#tagá K ;
! +N+Pl+Gen:%>X5ij%> PxCs ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>X5ijt K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>X5ijd%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5ijda K ;
! +N+Pl+Ill:%>X5ijdas%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>X5ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:%>X5ijn%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>X5ijs K ;
 +N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:%>X5ijst%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>X5ij K ;
! +N+Pl+Com:%>X5ij%> PxCs ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X5attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X5adtja%>n K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X5attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X5attja%>j K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X5attja%>jt K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»X5attja%>jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X5attja%>jda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X5attja%>jn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:»X5attja%>jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X5attja%>js K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:»X5attja%>jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X5attja%>j K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X5attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X5attja%>#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X5adtja%>n K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X5attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X5attja%>j K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X5attja%>j#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X5attja%>jt K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»X5attja%>jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X5attja%>jda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X5attja%>jn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:»X5attja%>jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X5attja%>js K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:»X5attja%>jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X5attja%>j K ;
 +N:»X5 DenominalAdjsC ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>X5ij R ;
 ! X5 for vow change


! oddsyllable plural only
LEXICON VÁLLDÁRA
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>a#dagi K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>a#dagá K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>a#tagá K ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>a K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ij K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>ij#dagi K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>ij#dagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>ij#tagá K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijt K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijd%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;
! +N+Sg+Ill:%>as%> PxCs ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:%>ijn%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijs K ;
 +N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:%>ijst%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ij K ;
! +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn%> PxCs; !^P^
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +N+Abe:%>adak K ;
 +N+Abe:%>ada K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ij R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»attja%>#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»attja%>#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»attja%>#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»adtja%>n K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»attja%>j K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»attja%>j#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»attja%>j#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»attja%>j#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»attja%>jt K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»attja%>jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»attja%>jda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»attja%>jn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:»attja%>jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»attja%>js K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:»attja%>jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»attja%>j K ;

LEXICON SNJIERÁGA
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>a K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ij K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>ij#dagi K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>ij#dagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>ij#tagá K ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijt K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijd%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;
! +N+Sg+Ill:%>as%> PxCs ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:%>ijn%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijs K ;
 +N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:%>ijst%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ij K ;
! +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn%> PxCs; !^P^
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +N+Abe:%>adak K ;
 +N+Abe:%>ada K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ij R ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»attja%>#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»attja%>#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»attja%>#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»adtja%>n K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»attja%> K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»attja%>j K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»attja%>j#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»attja%>j#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»attja%>j#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»attja%>jt K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:»attja%>jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»attja%>jda K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»attja%>jn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:»attja%>jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»attja%>js K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:»attja%>jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»attja%>j K ;

LEXICON NounRoot
 áhkkov+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:áhkkov GAHPER; !
 ájttek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ájtteg9 GAHPER ; !
 áldar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:álldar SÅHKÅR ; !
aldas:alldas GÁMAS ;
ålgusj:ålgutj GAHPER ;
 álmmuk#duobmár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:álmmuk#duobmár GAHPER; !
åppås:åbbås GÁMAS ;
 ára+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:árrag8 BENA ; !
árran GAHPER ;
 asjkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:assjkas GÁMAS ; !
 bæssásj#ájllek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:bæssásj#ájlleg9 GAHPER ; !
 báhko#vájas+Use/Sub:báhko#vádjas GÁMAS ; ! correct?
 bajkka#vitta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bajkka#viddag8 BENA ; !
bajusj:bajutj GAHPER ;
bårjås:bårjjås GÁMAS ;
bárro#giera:bárro#gierrag8 BENA ;
 berun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:berun GAHPER; !
 biera+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bierrag8 BENA ; !
biergas:bierggas GÁMAS ;
 bies0se#gáma+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bies'se#gábmag9 BENA ; !
 biesta#vitsur+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:biesta#vitsur GAHPER; !
 biesta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:biesstag8 BENA ; !
 birás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:birras GÁMAS ; !
 buojda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buojddag8 BENA ; !
buoskas:buosskas GÁMAS ;
 dágge#tjuokkun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dágge#tjuokkun GAHPER; !
 dáhpa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dáhppag8 BENA ; !
 dållår+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dållår GAHPER; !
 daŋás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:dagŋas GÁMAS ; !
 dårun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dårun GAHPER; !
dia#mehter GAHPER ;
dieda:diehtag8 BENA ;
dimbar:dimmbar SÅHKÅR ;
 drámátijkkár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:drámátijkkár GAHPER; !
 duobdá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:duobddág8 BENA ; !
 duobmár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:duobmár GAHPER; !
duottar:duoddar9 GÁMAS ;
duovda:duovddag8 BENA ;
duvda:duvddag8 BENA ;
 eksempel GAHPER ; !^LOAN
 fáttar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:fáddar SÅHKÅR ; !
fijkun GAHPER ;
gabus GAHPER ;
gåhkål:gåhkkål SÅHKÅR ;
 gahper#giedjek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gahper#giedjeg9 GAHPER ; !
 gálam+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gállam GÁMAS ; !
gåldå:gålldåg8 BENA ;
 gállasj#guojmitja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gállasj#guojmitj VÁLLDÁRA ; !
 gállatja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gállatj VÁLLDÁRA ; !
 gål0le#smirjár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gål'le#smirjár GAHPER ; !
gáma:gábmag8 BENA ;
gamár:gabmar9 GÁMAS ;
ganjál:gadnjal9 GÁMAS ;
 gåvvå#dájddár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gåvvå#dájddár GAHPER; !
giehta#tjála:giehta#tjállag8 BENA ;
gielas:giellas GÁMAS ;
giella#dieda:giella#diehtag8 BENA ;
giera:gierrag8 BENA ;
 gieva+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gievvag8 BENA ; !
gievkan GAHPER ;
gijma:gijmmag8 BENA ;
gintal:ginntal9 GÁMAS ;
 goasskem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:goasskem GAHPER; !
guober:guohper9 GÁMAS ;
guohpa:guohppag8 BENA ;
 guol0lár#båndor+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guol'lár#bånndor SÅHKÅR ; !
 guoppar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:guobbar9 GÁMAS ; !
 guosta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guosstag8 BENA ; !
 guovdásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guovdátj GAHPER ; !
gurpas:gurppas GÁMAS ;
 idja#biejv#galma+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:idja#biejv#galmmag8 BENA ; !
 idja#sjunjok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:idja#sjunjog9 GAHPER ; !
 jábbmek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jábbmeg9 GAHPER ; !
jåhkå#giera:jåhkå#gierrag8 BENA ;
 jáhkka#rádas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jáhkka#rádas GÁMAS ; !
jåhto#tjála:jåhto#tjállag8 BENA ;
kámmár GAHPER ;
ladás:lahtas GÁMAS ;
 lådde#bena+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:lådde#bednag8 BENA ; !
 låttåsj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:låttåtj GAHPER ; !
lihtar:lihttar SÅHKÅR ;
lihter:lihtter SÅHKÅR ;
mála:mállag8 BENA ;
 mánná#birás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:mánná#birras GÁMAS ; !
mátta:máddag8 BENA ;
 máttar#áhkkov+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:máttar#áhkkov GAHPER; !
 máttar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:máddar9 GÁMAS ; !
 moarsse#nejtsusj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:moarsse#nejtsutj GAHPER ; !
 muoger+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:muohker9 GÁMAS ; !
 muohta#buojda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:muohta#buojddag8 BENA ; !
 muohta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:muohttag8 BENA ; !
muohta#giera:muohta#gierrag8 BENA ;
muorra#giera:muorra#gierrag8 BENA ;
 nielgge#bena+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:nielgge#bednag8 BENA ; !
 nissun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:nissun GAHPER; !
 njáhtso#muohta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:njáhtso#muohttag8 BENA ; !
njaskas:njasskas GÁMAS ;
rábun GAHPER ;
 råhto#gattsak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:råhto#gattsag9 GAHPER ; !
rákkas:rággas GÁMAS ;
ruohtsas:ruohttsas GÁMAS ;
 ruohtta#iehket+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ruohtta#iehked9 GAHPER ; !
 ruomas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ruobmas GÁMAS ; !
 såhkår:såhkkår SÅHKÅR ;  ! Only long essive!
 såktå#muohta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:såktå#muohttag8 BENA ; !
 sárddem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sárddem GAHPER; !
 sarre#daŋás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:sarre#dagŋas GÁMAS ; !
skåhtål GAHPER ;
spiger:spihker SÅHKÅR ;
stáhta#dieda:stáhta#diehtag8 BENA ;
stielas:stiellas GÁMAS ;
 suohkan+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suohkan GAHPER; !
 suola+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suollag8 BENA ; !
suonjar:suodnjar9 GÁMAS ;
suovas:suovvas GÁMAS ;
tjagár:tjahkar9 GÁMAS ;
tjanás:tjadnas GÁMAS ;
tjårå:tjårråg8 BENA ;
 tjiegar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjiehkar9 GÁMAS ; !
tjieras:tjierras GÁMAS ;
 tjierrek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjierreg9 GAHPER ; !
 tjivgga#bena+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjivgga#bednag8 BENA ; !
tjuomas:tjuobmas GÁMAS ;
tjuorvas:tjuorvvas GÁMAS ;
tsåjtsås:tsåjttsås GÁMAS ;
 tsitsásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tsitsátj GAHPER ; !
 uksa#bellusa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:uksa#bellus VÁLLDÁRA ; !
urtas:urttas GÁMAS ;
vanás:vadnas GÁMAS ;
 viessok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:viessog9 GAHPER ; !
vitta:viddag8 BENA ;
vuolláj#tjála:vuolláj#tjállag8 BENA ;
vuoŋas:vuogŋas GÁMAS ;
 vuorkkár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuorkkár GAHPER; !
 vuotta#gálas#muohta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuotta#gálas#muohttag8 BENA ; !
